Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1232
Explosive materials; permit; application; form; fees.

An application for a storage, use, or business enterprise purchase permit for explosive materials shall be in such form and contain such information as the Nebraska State Patrol shall by rule and regulation prescribe. Each applicant for a permit shall pay a fee of fifty dollars in the case of a storage permit, ten dollars in the case of a use permit, and ten dollars in the case of a business enterprise purchase permit.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 264;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 21;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 11.